Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-203 Coverage and limitations. (a)
This part shall provide coverage for the policies and contracts specified in
subsection (b) to:

(1) Persons who, regardless of where they reside,
except for nonresident certificate holders under group policies or contracts,
are the beneficiaries, assignees, or payees of the persons covered under
paragraph (2);

(2) Persons who are owners of or certificate holders
under such policies or contracts, except structured settlement annuities, and
who:

(A) Are residents of this State; or

(B) Are not residents; provided that:

(i) The insurer that issued the policies or
contracts is domiciled in this State;

(ii) The state in which the persons reside has
associations similar to the association created by this part; and

(iii) The persons are not eligible for coverage
by an association in any other state because the insurer was not licensed in
the state at the time specified in the state's guaranty association law;

(3) For structured settlement annuities specified in
subsection (b), paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection shall not apply, and
this part, except as provided in paragraphs (4) and (5) of this subsection,
shall provide coverage to a person who is a payee under a structured settlement
annuity, or beneficiary of a payee if the payee is deceased, if the payee:

(A) Is a resident of this State, regardless
of where the contract owner resides; or

(B) Is not a resident; provided that:

(i) The contract owner of the structured
settlement annuity is a resident and neither the payee, beneficiary, nor
contract owner is eligible for coverage by the association in the state in
which the payee or contract owner resides; or

(ii) The contract owner of the structured
settlement annuity is not a resident, but the insurer that issued the
structured settlement annuity is domiciled in this State and the state in which
the contract owner resides has an association similar to the association
created by this part, and neither the payee, beneficiary, nor the contract owner
is eligible for coverage by the association of the state in which the payee or
contract owner resides;

(4) This part shall not provide coverage to a person
who is a payee or beneficiary of a contract owner resident of this State, if
the payee or beneficiary is afforded any coverage by the association of another
state; and

(5) This part is intended to provide coverage to a
person who is a resident of this State and, in certain circumstances, to a
nonresident. To avoid duplicate coverage, if a person who would otherwise
receive coverage under this part is provided coverage under the laws of any
other state, the person shall not be provided coverage under this part. In
determining the application of the provisions of this paragraph in situations
where a person could be covered by the association of more than one state,
whether as an owner, payee, beneficiary, or assignee, this part shall be
construed in conjunction with other state laws to result in coverage by only
one association.

(b)(1) This part shall provide coverage to the persons
specified in subsection (a) for direct, nongroup life, accident and health or
sickness, or annuity policies or contracts, for certificates under direct group
life, accident and health or sickness, or annuity policies or contracts, and
for supplemental contracts to any of these, in each case issued by member
insurers except as limited by this part. Annuity contracts and certificates
under group annuity contracts include allocated funding agreements, structured
settlement annuities, and any immediate or deferred annuity contracts.

(2) This part shall not provide coverage for:

(A) Any portion of a policy or contract not
guaranteed by the insurer, or under which the risk is borne by the policy or
contract owner;

(B) Any policy or contract of reinsurance,
unless assumption certificates have been issued pursuant to the reinsurance
policy or contract;

(C) Any portion of a policy or contract to
the extent that the rate of interest on which it is based:

(i) Averaged over the period of four years
prior to the date on which the association becomes obligated with respect to
such policy or contract, exceeds a rate of interest determined by subtracting
two percentage points from Moody's Corporate Bond Yield Average averaged for
that same four-year period or for such lesser period if the policy or contract
was issued less than four years before the association became obligated; and

(ii) On or after the date on which the
association becomes obligated with respect to such policy or contract, exceeds
the rate of interest determined by subtracting three percentage points from
Moody's Corporate Bond Yield Average as most recently available;

(D) Any portion of a policy or contract
issued to a plan or program of an employer, association, or other person to
provide life, accident and health or sickness, or annuity benefits to its
employees, members, or other persons to the extent that the plan or program is
self-funded or uninsured, including but not limited to benefits payable by an employer,
association, or other person under:

(i) A Multiple Employer Welfare Arrangement as
defined in section 514 of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974,
as amended;

(ii) A minimum premium group insurance plan;

(iii) A stop-loss group insurance plan; or

(iv) An administrative services only contract;

(E) Any portion of a policy or contract to
the extent that it provides dividends, experience rating credits, or voting
rights, or provides that any fees or allowances be paid to any person,
including the policy or contract holder, in connection with the service to or
administration of such policy or contract;

(F) Any policy or contract issued in this
State by a member insurer at a time when it was not licensed or did not have a
certificate of authority to issue such policy or contract in this State;

(G) Any portion of a policy or contract to
the extent that the assessments required by this part with respect to the
policy or contract are preempted or otherwise not permitted by federal or state
law;

(H) Any obligation that does not arise under
the express written terms of the policy or contract issued by the insurer to
the contract owner or policy owner, including without limitation:

(i) Claims based on marketing materials;

(ii) Claims based on side letters, riders, or
other documents that were issued by the insurer without meeting applicable
policy form filing or approval requirements;

(iii) Misrepresentations of or regarding policy
benefits;

(iv) Extra-contractual claims; or

(v) A claim for penalties or consequential or
incidental damages;

(I) Any contractual agreement that
establishes the member insurer's obligations to provide a book value accounting
guaranty for defined contribution benefit plan participants by reference to a
portfolio of assets that is owned by the benefit plan or its trustee, which in
each case is not an affiliate of the member insurer;

(J) Any unallocated annuity contract;

(K) Any portion of a policy or contract to
the extent it provides for interest or other changes in value to be determined
by the use of an index or other external reference stated in the policy or
contract, but that have not been credited to the policy or contract, or as to
which the policy or contract owner's rights are subject to forfeiture, as of
the date the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under this
part. If a policy's or contract's interest or changes in value are credited
less frequently than annually, then for purposes of determining the values that
have been credited and are not subject to forfeiture under section 431:16-403(b)(2)(L),
the interest or change in value determined by using the procedures defined in
the policy or contract shall be credited as if the contractual date of crediting
interest or changing values was the date of impairment or insolvency and shall
not be subject to forfeiture; or

(L) Any policy or contract providing any
hospital, medical, prescription drug, or other health care benefits pursuant to
part C or part D of subchapter XVIII, chapter 7, title 42 of the United States
Code, commonly known as medicare part C and D, or any regulations adopted
pursuant thereto.

(c) The benefits for which the association may
become liable shall in no event exceed the lesser of:

(1) The contractual obligations for which the insurer
is liable or would have been liable if it were not an impaired or insolvent
insurer, or

(2) With respect to any one life, regardless of the
number of policies or contracts:

(A) $300,000 in life insurance death
benefits, but not more than $100,000 in net cash surrender and net cash
withdrawal values for life insurance;

(B) In accident and health or sickness
insurance benefits:

(i) $100,000 for coverages not defined as
disability insurance or basic hospital, medical, and surgical insurance, or
major medical insurance or long-term care insurance, including any net cash
surrender and net cash withdrawal values;

(ii) $300,000 for disability insurance and
$300,000 for long-term care insurance; or

(iii) $500,000 for basic hospital, medical, and
surgical insurance or major medical insurance;

(C) $250,000 in the present value of annuity
benefits, including net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values; or

(D) With respect to each payee of a structured
settlement annuity, or beneficiary or beneficiaries of the payee if deceased,
$250,000 in present value annuity benefits, in the aggregate, including net
cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values, if any.

(d) In no event shall the association be
obligated to cover more than:

(1) An aggregate of $300,000 in benefits with respect
to any one life under subsection (c) except with respect to benefits for basic
hospital, medical, and surgical insurance and major medical insurance under
subsection (c)(2)(B), in which case the aggregate liability of the association
shall not exceed $500,000 with respect to any one individual; or

(2) $5,000,000 in benefits with respect to one owner
or multiple non-group policies of life insurance, regardless of:

(A) The number of policies and contracts held
by the owner;

(B) Whether the policy owner is an
individual, firm, corporation, or other person; and

(C) Whether the persons insured are officers,
managers, employees, or other persons.

(e) The limitations set forth in this section
are limitations on the benefits for which the association is obligated before
taking into account its subrogation and assignment rights or the extent to
which those benefits could be provided out of the assets of the impaired or
insolvent insurer attributable to covered policies. The costs of the
association's obligations under this part may be met by the use of assets
attributable to covered policies or reimbursed to the association pursuant to
its subrogation and assignment rights.

(f) In performing its obligations to provide
coverage under section 431:16-208, the association shall not be required to
guarantee, assume, reinsure, or perform, or cause to be guaranteed, assumed,
reinsured, or performed, the contractual obligations of the insolvent or
impaired insurer under a covered policy or contract that do not materially
affect the economic values or economic benefits of the covered policy or
contract. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155, §92; am L 2003, c 212,
§113; am L 2012, c 250, §4]

Note

The 2012 amendment shall not apply to any proceedings in
which a member insurer is placed under an order of liquidation prior to July 1,
2012. L 2012, c 250, §15.

Section 431:16-403(b)(2)(L), referred to in subsection (b)(2)(K),
does not exist.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next